Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2058
Public hospital; marketing strategies and plans authorized.

In addition to powers and duties otherwise provided by law, a hospital which is owned or operated by a political subdivision, state agency, or other governmental entity may develop marketing strategies for its existing hospital health services or any hospital health service to be provided in the future and may develop strategic plans for the development of any future hospital health service or facility. Market strategies and strategic plans may be developed in cooperation with other health care providers.

Laws 1985, LB 61, § 3.